Utah statutes.
58-60-302.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Sections 58-1-102 and 58-60-102, as used in
this part:
(1)  "Assess" means the use of diagnostic procedures, tests, and interview
techniques generally accepted as standard in mental health therapy to diagnose
any condition related to mental, emotional, behavioral, and social disorders
or dysfunctions.
(2)  "Board" means the Marriage and Family Therapist Licensing Board created
in Section 58-60-303.
(3)  "Practice of marriage and family therapy" includes:
(a)  the process of providing professional mental health therapy including
psychotherapy to individuals, couples, families, or groups;
(b)  utilizing established principles that recognize the interrelated nature
of individual problems and dysfunctions in family members to assess, diagnose,
and treat mental, emotional, and behavioral disorders;
(c)  individual, premarital, relationship, marital, divorce, and family
therapy;
(d)  specialized modes of treatment for the purpose of diagnosing and treating
mental, emotional, and behavioral disorders, modifying interpersonal and
intrapersonal dysfunction, and promoting mental health; and
(e)  assessment utilized to develop, recommend, and implement appropriate
plans of treatment, dispositions, and placement related to the functioning of
the individual, couple, family, or group.
